District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1756

Procedural requirements.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 19, 30 DCR 390
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(t), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1938.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under Law 4-209, see Mayor’s Order 83-123, May 6, 1983.